Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-811
Board; member; conflict of interest.

No member of the board and no officer or employee of a regional metropolitan transit authority shall have any private financial interest, profit, or benefit in any contract, work, or business of such authority or in the sale or lease of any property to or from such authority.

Laws 2019, LB492, § 11.